Utah statutes.
67-5a-2.   Terms -- Filling vacancies -- Chair.

(1)  The term of each council member is four years, unless the term is earlier terminated by:

(a)  the authority that designated the member; or

(b)  the member ceasing to hold the office that qualified him for membership.

(2)  A member whose term has expired may continue, for not more than four months, to serve as a council member until a successor is selected and qualified.

(3)  Council members may serve for more than one successive term.

(4)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for a full term that commences on the date of appointment.

(5)  The council shall elect by a majority vote one of its members as chair at its first meeting and then annually.

